Florida, session 2026, HB441.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
32
33 Section 1. Present subsections (7) through (19) of section
34 253.0341, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8)
35 through (20), respectively, subsection (11) of that section is
36 amended, and a new subsection (7) is added to that section, to
37 read:
38 253.0341 Surplus of state-owned lands.—
39 (7) At least 30 days before any meeting of the Acquisition
40 and Restoration Council or the board of trustees to review the
41 proposed sale of conservation lands, the Division of State Lands
42 must publish the following information on its website:
43 (a) The parcels of state-owned land for sale; and
44 (b) A statement from the division explaining why the lands
45 are no longer needed for conservation purposes.
46 (11) Requests to surplus lands may be made by any public
47 or private entity or person and shall be determined by the board
48 of trustees. All requests to surplus conservation lands shall be
49 submitted to the lead managing agency for review and
50 recommendation to the Acquisition and Restoration Council, and
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb441 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 441 2026 Legislature
51 all requests to surplus nonconservation lands shall be submitted
52 to the Division of State Lands for review and recommendation to
53 the board of trustees. The lead managing agencies shall review
54 such requests and make recommendations to the council within 90
55 days after receipt of the requests. Any requests to surplus
56 conservation lands that are not acted upon within the 90-day
57 period shall be immediately scheduled for hearing at the next
58 regularly scheduled meeting of the council. Requests to surplus
59 lands shall be considered by the board of trustees within 60
60 days after receipt of the requests from the council or division.
61 Requests to surplus lands pursuant to this subsection are not
62 required to be offered to state agencies as provided in
63 subsection (8) (7).
64 Section 2. Present paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of
65 subsection (4) of section 253.42, Florida Statutes, are
66 redesignated as paragraphs (d), (e), and (f), respectively,
67 paragraph (a) of that subsection is amended, and new paragraphs
68 (b) and (c) are added to that subsection, to read:
69 253.42 Board of trustees may exchange lands.—This section
70 applies to all lands owned by, vested in, or titled in the name
71 of the board of trustees whether the lands were acquired by the
72 state as a purchase, or through gift, donation, or any other
73 conveyance for which no consideration was paid.
74 (4)(a) A person who owns land contiguous to state-owned
75 land titled to the board of trustees may submit a request to the
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb441 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 441 2026 Legislature
76 Division of State Lands to exchange all or a portion of the
77 privately owned land for all or a portion of the state-owned
78 land, whereby the state retains a permanent conservation
79 easement over all or a portion of the exchanged state-owned land
80 and a permanent conservation easement over all or a portion of
81 the exchanged privately owned land. State-owned land exchanged
82 pursuant to this subsection must shall be contiguous to the
83 privately owned land upon which the state retains a permanent
84 conservation easement. Each parcel proposed for exchange
85 pursuant to this subsection must have at least one appraisal
86 that follows the appraisal criteria, techniques, and methods
87 adopted by the board of trustees pursuant to s. 253.025(8)(e) If
88 the division elects to proceed with a request, the division must
89 submit the request to the Acquisition and Restoration Council
90 for review and the council must provide recommendations to the
91 division. If the division elects to forward a request to the
92 board of trustees, the division must provide its recommendations
93 and the recommendations of the council to the board. This
94 subsection does not apply to state-owned sovereign submerged
95 land.
96 (b) At least 30 days before any meeting of the Acquisition
97 and Restoration Council or the board of trustees to review the
98 proposed land exchange of conservation lands, the Division of
99 State Lands shall publish the following information on its
100 website:
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb441 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 441 2026 Legislature
101 1. The parcels of state-owned lands proposed for exchange;
102 2. The privately owned parcels of land proposed for
103 exchange;
104 3. The portions of the lands identified in subparagraphs
105 1. and 2. which will be preserved in a permanent conservation
106 easement;
107 4. A statement from the division explaining how the
108 exchange will result in a conservation benefit to the state; and
109 5. Any recommendations from the division and the council
110 related to the request.
111 (c) If the Division of State Lands elects to proceed with
112 a request, the division must submit the request to the council
113 for review, and the council must provide recommendations to the
114 division. If the division elects to forward a request to the
115 board of trustees, the division must provide its recommendations
116 and the recommendations of the council to the board.
117 Section 3. Paragraph (a) of subsection (6) of section
118 373.089, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
119 373.089 Sale or exchange of lands, or interests or rights
120 in lands.—The governing board of the district may sell lands, or
121 interests or rights in lands, to which the district has acquired
122 title or to which it may hereafter acquire title in the
123 following manner:
124 (6) Any lands the title to which is vested in the
125 governing board of a water management district may be surplused
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb441 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 441 2026 Legislature
126 pursuant to the procedures set forth in this section and s.
127 373.056 and the following:
128 (a) For those lands designated as acquired for
129 conservation purposes, the governing board shall make a
130 determination that the lands are no longer needed for
131 conservation purposes and may dispose of them by a two-thirds
132 vote. At least 30 days before the governing board meets to
133 review the proposed sale or exchange of such lands, the
134 governing board shall publish the following information on its
135 website, as applicable:
136 1. The parcels of district-owned lands for sale or
137 proposed for exchange;
138 2. The parcels of privately owned lands proposed for
139 exchange;
140 3. The portions of the lands identified in subparagraphs
141 1. and 2. which will be preserved in a permanent conservation
142 easement; and
143 4. A statement from the district explaining why the lands
144 are no longer needed for conservation purposes.
145
146 If the Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust Fund
147 declines to accept title to the lands offered under this
148 section, the land may be disposed of by the district under the
149 provisions of this section.
150 Section 4. Subsection (1) of section 215.196, Florida
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb441 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 441 2026 Legislature
151 Statutes, is amended to read:
152 215.196 Architects Incidental Trust Fund; creation;
153 assessment.—
154 (1) There is created the Architects Incidental Trust Fund
155 for the purpose of:
156 (a) Collecting all funds received through the sale of
157 surplus state-owned office buildings, as defined in s. 255.248,
158 and the nonconservation lands associated with such buildings;
159 (b) Diverting funds referenced in s. 253.0341(15)(b) s.
160 253.0341(14)(b); and
161 (c) Providing sufficient funds for the operation of the
162 facilities development activities of the Department of
163 Management Services.
164 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb441 -01-er